Illinois, session 104th, HB4276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 534-200 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-200)7    Sec. 34-200. Definitions. For the purposes of Sections 834-200 through 34-235 of this Article: 9    "Capital improvement plan" means a plan that identifies 10capital projects to be started or finished within the 11designated period, excluding projects funded by locally raised 12capital not exceeding $10,000.13    "Co-location" means a school action in which 2 or more 14separate schools, each under the direction of its own 15principal and local school council and maintaining a distinct 16program and attendance area or other enrollment, are assigned 17by the board to operate entirely within the same school 18building. "Co-location" does not include an existing school's 19temporary use of available, vacant, or underutilized space in 20a second school building to increase capacity or relieve 21overcrowding if:22        (1) that school continues to additionally operate in 23    its current building under its own principal and local   HB4276- 2 -LRB104 16824 LNS 30233 b1    school council and to serve the same attendance area or 2    population; and3        (2) the board designates the use of the second 4    building's space as a temporary measure for a specified 5    period of time. 6    "Community area" means a geographic area of the City of 7Chicago defined by the chief executive officer as part of the 8development of the educational facilities master plan.9    "Space utilization" means the percentage achieved by 10dividing the school's actual enrollment by its design 11capacity.12    "School closing" or "school closure" means the closing of 13a school, the effect of which is the assignment and transfer of 14all students enrolled at that school to one or more designated 15receiving schools.16    "School consolidation" means the consolidation of 2 or 17more schools by closing one or more schools and reassigning 18the students to another school.19    "Phase-out" means the gradual cessation of enrollment in 20certain grades each school year until a school closes or is 21consolidated with another school.22    "School action" means any school closing; school 23consolidation; co-location; boundary change that requires 24reassignment of students, unless the reassignment is to a new 25school with an attendance area boundary and is made to relieve 26overcrowding; or phase-out.  HB4276- 3 -LRB104 16824 LNS 30233 b1(Source: P.A. 97-473, eff. 1-1-12; 97-474, eff. 8-22-11; 297-813, eff. 7-13-12.)